apertium-pl-sk.pl.dix
        <p>
          <l>szy</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szy</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szy</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sza</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sze</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sze</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sze</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sze</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sze</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>sze</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pierw/szy__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>szy<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lep/szy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="najlep/szy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="żółt/szy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="najżółt/szy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pierwszy"><i>pierw</i><par n="pierw/szy__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dobry"><p><l>lep</l><r>dobry</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dobry"><p><l>najlep</l><r>dobry</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drogi"><p><l>droż</l><r>drogi</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drogi"><p><l>najdroż</l><r>drogi</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ostry"><p><l>ostrzej</l><r>ostry</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ostry"><p><l>najostrzej</l><r>ostry</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mały"><p><l>mniej</l><r>mały</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mały"><p><l>najmniej</l><r>mały</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
